Illinois, session 104th, SB1546.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Budget Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 650-5 as follows: 7    (15 ILCS 20/50-5)8    Sec. 50-5. Governor to submit State budget. 9    (a) The Governor shall, as soon as possible and not later 10than the second Wednesday in March in 2010 (March 10, 2010), 11the third Wednesday in February in 2011, the fourth Wednesday 12in February in 2012 (February 22, 2012), the first Wednesday 13in March in 2013 (March 6, 2013), the fourth Wednesday in March 14in 2014 (March 26, 2014), the first Wednesday in February in 152022 (February 2, 2022), and the third Wednesday in February 16of each year thereafter, except as otherwise provided in this 17Section, submit a State budget, embracing therein the amounts 18recommended by the Governor to be appropriated to the 19respective departments, offices, and institutions, and for all 20other public purposes, the estimated revenues from taxation, 21and the estimated revenues from sources other than taxation. 22Except with respect to the capital development provisions of 23the State budget, beginning with the revenue estimates   SB1546- 2 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1prepared for fiscal year 2012, revenue estimates shall be 2based solely on: (i) revenue sources (including non-income 3resources), rates, and levels that exist as of the date of the 4submission of the State budget for the fiscal year and (ii) 5revenue sources (including non-income resources), rates, and 6levels that have been passed by the General Assembly as of the 7date of the submission of the State budget for the fiscal year 8and that are authorized to take effect in that fiscal year. 9Except with respect to the capital development provisions of 10the State budget, the Governor shall determine available 11revenue, deduct the cost of essential government services, 12including, but not limited to, pension payments and debt 13service, and assign a percentage of the remaining revenue to 14each statewide prioritized goal, as established in Section 1550-25 of this Law, taking into consideration the proposed 16goals set forth in the report of the Commission established 17under that Section. The Governor shall also demonstrate how 18spending priorities for the fiscal year fulfill those 19statewide goals. The amounts recommended by the Governor for 20appropriation to the respective departments, offices and 21institutions shall be formulated according to each 22department's, office's, and institution's ability to 23effectively deliver services that meet the established 24statewide goals. The amounts relating to particular functions 25and activities shall be further formulated in accordance with 26the object classification specified in Section 13 of the State   SB1546- 3 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1Finance Act. In addition, the amounts recommended by the 2Governor for appropriation shall take into account each State 3agency's effectiveness in achieving its prioritized goals for 4the previous fiscal year, as set forth in Section 50-25 of this 5Law, giving priority to agencies and programs that have 6demonstrated a focus on the prevention of waste and the 7maximum yield from resources. 8    Beginning in fiscal year 2011, the Governor shall 9distribute written quarterly financial reports on operating 10funds, which may include general, State, or federal funds and 11may include funds related to agencies that have significant 12impacts on State operations, and budget statements on all 13appropriated funds to the General Assembly and the State 14Comptroller. The reports shall be submitted no later than 45 15days after the last day of each quarter of the fiscal year and 16shall be posted on the Governor's Office of Management and 17Budget's website on the same day. The reports shall be 18prepared and presented for each State agency and on a 19statewide level in an executive summary format that may 20include, for the fiscal year to date, individual itemizations 21for each significant revenue type as well as itemizations of 22expenditures and obligations, by agency, with an appropriate 23level of detail. The reports shall include a calculation of 24the actual total budget surplus or deficit for the fiscal year 25to date. The Governor shall also present periodic budget 26addresses throughout the fiscal year at the invitation of the   SB1546- 4 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1General Assembly. 2    The Governor shall not propose expenditures and the 3General Assembly shall not enact appropriations that exceed 4the resources estimated to be available, as provided in this 5Section. Appropriations may be adjusted during the fiscal year 6by means of one or more supplemental appropriation bills if 7any State agency either fails to meet or exceeds the goals set 8forth in Section 50-25 of this Law. 9    For the purposes of Article VIII, Section 2 of the 1970 10Illinois Constitution, the State budget for the following 11funds shall be prepared on the basis of revenue and 12expenditure measurement concepts that are in concert with 13generally accepted accounting principles for governments:14        (1) General Revenue Fund.15        (2) Common School Fund.16        (3) Educational Assistance Fund.17        (4) Road Fund.18        (5) Motor Fuel Tax Fund.19        (6) Agricultural Premium Fund.20    These funds shall be known as the "budgeted funds". The 21revenue estimates used in the State budget for the budgeted 22funds shall include the estimated beginning fund balance, plus 23revenues estimated to be received during the budgeted year, 24plus the estimated receipts due the State as of June 30 of the 25budgeted year that are expected to be collected during the 26lapse period following the budgeted year, minus the receipts   SB1546- 5 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1collected during the first 2 months of the budgeted year that 2became due to the State in the year before the budgeted year. 3Revenues shall also include estimated federal reimbursements 4associated with the recognition of Section 25 of the State 5Finance Act liabilities. For any budgeted fund for which 6current year revenues are anticipated to exceed expenditures, 7the surplus shall be considered to be a resource available for 8expenditure in the budgeted fiscal year.9    Expenditure estimates for the budgeted funds included in 10the State budget shall include the costs to be incurred by the 11State for the budgeted year, to be paid in the next fiscal 12year, excluding costs paid in the budgeted year which were 13carried over from the prior year, where the payment is 14authorized by Section 25 of the State Finance Act. For any 15budgeted fund for which expenditures are expected to exceed 16revenues in the current fiscal year, the deficit shall be 17considered as a use of funds in the budgeted fiscal year.18    Revenues and expenditures shall also include transfers 19between funds that are based on revenues received or costs 20incurred during the budget year.21    Appropriations for expenditures shall also include all 22anticipated statutory continuing appropriation obligations 23that are expected to be incurred during the budgeted fiscal 24year.25    By March 15 of each year, the Commission on Government 26Forecasting and Accountability shall prepare revenue and fund   SB1546- 6 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1transfer estimates in accordance with the requirements of this 2Section and report those estimates to the General Assembly and 3the Governor. 4    For all funds other than the budgeted funds, the proposed 5expenditures shall not exceed funds estimated to be available 6for the fiscal year as shown in the budget. Appropriation for a 7fiscal year shall not exceed funds estimated by the General 8Assembly to be available during that year.9    Beginning with the budget prepared for Fiscal Year 2027, 10the rate of growth of appropriations from the State general 11funds over the preceding fiscal year appropriations from the 12State general funds shall not exceed the rate of growth of the 13Illinois economy. For the purposes of this Section, the rate 14of growth of the Illinois economy is the compound annual 15growth rate of the gross domestic product in the State over the 16preceding 10 calendar years, calculated using data reported by 17the United States Bureau of Economic Analysis or its successor 18agency before the December 31 that immediately precedes the 19beginning of the applicable fiscal year.20    (b) By February 24, 2010, the Governor must file a written 21report with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the 22House of Representatives containing the following:23        (1) for fiscal year 2010, the revenues for all 24    budgeted funds, both actual to date and estimated for the 25    full fiscal year;26        (2) for fiscal year 2010, the expenditures for all   SB1546- 7 -LRB104 10316 SPS 20390 b1    budgeted funds, both actual to date and estimated for the 2    full fiscal year;3        (3) for fiscal year 2011, the estimated revenues for 4    all budgeted funds, including without limitation the 5    affordable General Revenue Fund appropriations, for the 6    full fiscal year; and7        (4) for fiscal year 2011, an estimate of the 8    anticipated liabilities for all budgeted funds, including 9    without limitation the affordable General Revenue Fund 10    appropriations, debt service on bonds issued, and the 11    State's contributions to the pension systems, for the full 12    fiscal year. 13    Between July 1 and August 31 of each fiscal year, the 14members of the General Assembly and members of the public may 15make written budget recommendations to the Governor. 16    Beginning with budgets prepared for fiscal year 2013, the 17budgets submitted by the Governor and appropriations made by 18the General Assembly for all executive branch State agencies 19must adhere to a method of budgeting where each priority must 20be justified each year according to merit rather than 21according to the amount appropriated for the preceding year. 22(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21.)